Utah statutes.
39-6-114.   Chapter interpretation -- Federal law.

Cases from the federal Court of Appeals for the Armed Forces and the federal Courts of  Criminal Appeals that interpret provisions of the Uniform Code of Military Justice shall be followed in interpretation of Section 39-6-24 and Sections 39-6-66 through 39-6-106, where appropriate and applicable.



Amended by Chapter 79, 1996 General Session

